Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-704
Candidates; delegate or alternate delegate to national convention; filing form; contents.

Any person seeking to be elected as a delegate or alternate delegate to the national convention of a political party shall submit a filing form under this section regardless of the method of election used by the political party. The filing form for nomination of a candidate for election as a delegate or alternate delegate to the national convention of a political party shall (1) contain a statement of commitment to a candidate for the office of President of the United States or that he or she is uncommitted, (2) include a pledge swearing to support the candidate for President of the United States to which the candidate for delegate or alternate delegate to the national convention is committed until (a) such candidate receives less than thirty-five percent of the votes for nomination by such convention or releases the delegate from such commitment or (b) two convention nominating ballots have been taken, and (3) be filed with the political party. No filing form for nomination shall be accepted unless signed by the candidate.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 204;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 56.

The expression of a preference for President by those voting at primary election does not control presidential electors, and is only morally binding on delegates to national party conventions. State ex rel. Nebraska Rep. State C. Com. v. Wait, 92 Neb. 313, 138 N.W. 159 (1912), 43 L.R.A.N.S. 282 (1912).